src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON h37e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:i  Neu_Flag  ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:ið Neu_Flag  ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:i  Neu_Flag  ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:ið Neu_Flag  ;
              +N+Neu:   S_N_SGD_i ;
              +N+Neu:i  S_N_SGG_s ;

LEXICON h_flt37
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
  h_flt36 ;

LEXICON h38
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA      ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD       ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG       ;

LEXICON h40
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:fur     Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:rið     Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:fur     Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:rið     Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:ri      Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:rinum   Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:furs    Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:fursins Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:fur     Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:rini    Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:fur     Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:rini    Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:rum     Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def:runum   Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:ra      Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def:ranna   Neu_Flag ;

LEXICON h40_2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:tul     Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:lið     Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:tul     Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:lið     Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:li      Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:linum   Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:tuls    Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:tulsins Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:tul     Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:lini    Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:tul     Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:lini    Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:lum     Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def:lunum   Neu_Flag ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:la      Neu_Flag ;
   +N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def:lanna   Neu_Flag ;

LEXICON h41/9
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
  h41 ;
  h9  ;

LEXICON h41
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
  h41e    ;
  h_flt41 ;

LEXICON h41e 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 h3e ;
 !
LEXICON h_flt41 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:%>ini Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:%>ini Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ir Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ir Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD       ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG	     ;





!    ======================== !
!! # Layer 2: Case inflection 
!    ======================== !

!! This is the second layer. Here we do indefinite
!! forms and compounds.

!! ## Lexica for masculine nouns
! _______________

!! ### Lexica for weak case suffixes.

!! #### Singular
LEXICON W_M_SGNOM
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for weak masculines, pointing to definites
 +Sg+Nom:%>i DF_N_SGm_indef ;
 +Sg+Nom:%>i DF_N_SGm_def   ;
!
LEXICON W_M_SGACC
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** etc for risan
 +Sg+Acc:%>a DF_A_SGm ; !
LEXICON W_M_SGDAT
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for 
 +Sg+Dat:%>a DF_D_SGm ;
!
LEXICON W_M_SGDAT_mixed 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for felagnum
 +Sg+Dat+Indef:%>a   ENDLEX ;
   +Sg+Dat+Def:%>num ENDLEX ;
!
LEXICON W_M_SGGEN
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for 
 +Sg+Gen+Indef:%>a   ENDLEX ;
 +Sg+Gen+Indef:%>a   R ; ! compound
   +Sg+Gen+Def:%>ans ENDLEX ; !XXX ans?



!! #### Plural
LEXICON W_M_PLNOM
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for -ar-
 +Pl+Nom:%>ar DF_N_PLm ;
!
LEXICON W_M_PLNOM_UR
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for -ur-
 +Pl+Nom:%>ur DF_N_PLm ;
!
LEXICON W_M_PLACC
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for -ar-
 +Pl+Acc:%>ar DF_A_PLm ;
!
LEXICON W_M_PLACC_UR
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for -ur-
 +Pl+Acc:%>ur DF_A_PLm ;
!
LEXICON W_M_PLDAT
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for -u-
 +Pl+Dat:%>u DF_D_PL ;
!
LEXICON W_M_PLGEN
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for -a-
 +Pl+Gen:%>a DF_G_PL ;




!! ### Strong case suffixes
! ____________________


!! #### Nominative Sg
LEXICON S_M_SGNOM
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg+Nom:%>ur  DF_N_SGm_indef ;
 +Sg+Nom:%>uri DF_N_SGm_def   ;
!
LEXICON S_M_SGNOM_NULL
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg+Nom: DF_N_SGm ;
 +Sg+Nom: DF_N_SGm ;


!! #### Accusative Sg
!
LEXICON S_M_SGACC
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg+Acc:    DF_A_SGm_indef ; !sand
 +Sg+Acc:%>i DF_A_SGm_def   ; !sandin
 +Sg+Acc:    R ; ! stem compound

!! #### Dative Sg
!
LEXICON S_M_SGDAT
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg+Dat:%>i DF_D_SGm ;
!
LEXICON S_M_SGDAT_2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
     +Sg+Dat:%>i          DF_D_SGm ;
 +Sg+Dat+Def:^GVDEL%>num ENDLEX        ;
!
LEXICON S_M_SGDAT_NULL
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg+Dat: DF_D_SGm ;

!! #### Genitive Sg
!
LEXICON S_M_SGGEN
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg+Gen:%>s DF_G_SGm ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>s R ; ! gen compound!
LEXICON S_M_SGGEN_NULL
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg+Gen: DF_G_SGm ;
 +Sg+Gen: R ; ! gen compound!
LEXICON S_M_SGGEN_AR
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg+Gen:%>ar DF_G_SGm ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>ar R ; ! gen compound

!! ### Plural forms

!! #### Nominative
!
LEXICON S_M_PLNOM
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Pl+Nom:%>ar DF_N_PLm ;
!
LEXICON S_M_PLNOM_IR
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Pl+Nom:%>ir DF_N_PLm ;
!
LEXICON S_M_PLNOM_UR
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Pl+Nom:%>ur DF_N_PLm ;
!
LEXICON S_M_PLNOM_NULL
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Pl+Nom:    DF_N_PLm_indef ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>i DF_N_PLm_def   ;
!
LEXICON S_M_PLNOM_NULL_NULL
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  +Pl+Nom:     DF_N_PLm_indef ;
  +Pl+Nom:     DF_N_PLm_def   ;
  

!! #### Accusative
LEXICON S_M_PLACC
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Pl+Acc:%>ar DF_A_PLm ;
!
LEXICON S_M_PLACC_IR
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Pl+Acc:%>ir DF_A_PLm ;
!
LEXICON S_M_PLACC_UR
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Pl+Acc:%>ur DF_A_PLm ;
!
LEXICON S_M_PLACC_NULL
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Pl+Acc:    DF_A_PLm_indef ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>i DF_A_PLm_def   ;
!
LEXICON S_M_PLACC_NULL_NULL
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  +Pl+Acc:     DF_A_PLm_indef ;
  +Pl+Acc:     DF_A_PLm_def   ;


!! #### Dative
!
LEXICON S_M_PLDAT
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Pl+Dat:%>u DF_D_PL ;
!
LEXICON S_M_PLDATm ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** skóm
 +Pl+Dat: DF_D_PL ;

!! #### Genitive
!
LEXICON S_M_PLGEN
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Pl+Gen:%>a DF_G_PL ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>a R       ; ! gen pl compound

LEXICON S_M_PLGEN_AR
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Pl+Gen:%>ar DF_G_PL_AR ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>ar R       ; ! gen pl compound

!! ## Feminine forms
! ______________

!! ### Singular case suffixes.

!! #### Nominative
!
LEXICON W_F_SGNOM
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg+Nom:%>a DF_N_SGf_W ;
!
LEXICON S_F_SGNAD
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg+Nom: DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +Sg+Acc: DF_A_SGf_S ;
 +Sg+Acc: R ; ! stem compound
 +Sg+Dat: DF_D_SGf_S ;
 
!! #### Oblique
!
LEXICON W_F_SGOBL
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg+Acc:%>u DF_A_SGf_W ;
 +Sg+Dat:%>u DF_D_SGf_W ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>u DF_G_SGf_W ;
!
LEXICON S_F_SGGEN
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg+Gen:%>ar DF_G_SGf_S ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>ar R ; ! gen compound!
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>s R ; ! substandard gen compound! men!! vinglas / raudvinsglas!!
LEXICON S_F_SGGEN_NULL
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg+Gen: DF_G_SGf_S ;




!! ### Plural case suffixes
!
LEXICON F_PLNA_UR
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Pl+Nom:%>ur DF_NA_PLf ;          ! kommunur
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>ar DF_NA_PLf ; ! kommunar (wrong)
 +Pl+Acc:%>ur DF_NA_PLf ;          ! kommunurnar
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:%>u DF_NA_PLf ;  ! kommununar (wrong)
!
LEXICON F_PLNA_IR
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Pl+Nom:%>ir DF_NA_PLf ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>ir DF_NA_PLf ;
!
LEXICON F_PLNA_AR
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Pl+Nom:%>ar DF_NA_PLf ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>ar DF_NA_PLf ;
!
LEXICON F_PLNA_NULL
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Pl+Nom: DF_NA_PLf ;
 +Pl+Acc: DF_NA_PLf ;
!
LEXICON F_PLDAT
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Pl+Dat:%>u DF_D_PL ;
!
LEXICON F_PLGEN
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Pl+Gen:%>a DF_G_PL ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>a R ; ! gen compound


!! ## Neuter forms
! ____________
!! ### Singular
!
LEXICON S_N_SGNA
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg+Nom: DF_NA_SGn ;
 +Sg+Acc: DF_NA_SGn ;
 +Sg+Acc: R ; ! stem compound
 !
LEXICON S_N_SGDG
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg+Dat: DF_D_SGn ;
 +Sg+Gen: DF_G_SGn ;
