src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
metall:metall h41 ;
dekret:dekret h41 ;
skelett:skelett h41 ;
perspektiv:perspektiv h41 ;
organ:organ h41 ;
kartong:kartong h41 ;
synonym:synonym h41 ;
homonym:homonym h41 ;
antonym:antonym h41 ;
akronym:akronym h41 ;
kryptonym:kryptonym h41 ;
eponym:eponym h41 ;
pseudonym:pseudonym h41 ;
anonym:anonym h41 ;
patronym:patronym h41 ;
primerpatronym:primer#patronym h41 ;
sekunderpatronym:sekunder#patronym h41 ;
anthroponym:anthroponym h41 ;
hyperonym:hyperonym h41 ;
hyponym:hyponym h41 ;
metronym:metronym h41 ;
prinsipp:prinsipp h41 ;
avskrivingarprinsipp:av#skrivingar#prinsipp h41 ;
genom:genom h41 ;
syndrom:syndrom h41 ;
symbol:symbol h41 ;
idol:idol h41 ; ! xxx check
resume:resume h41 ;
rísalamang:rísalamang h41 ;
krystall:krystall h41/9 ;
modell:modell h41 ;
problem:problem h41 ;
alkoholproblem:alkohol#problem h41 ;
system:system h41 ;
programm:programm h41 ;
video:video h41 ;
brúdleyp:brúdleyp h41 ;
skáp:skáp h41 ;
vaskiskáp:vaski#skáp h41 ;
fabrikat:fabrikat h41 ;
worddokument:word#dokument h41 ;
dokument:dokument h41 ;
turistbureau:turist#bureau h41 ;
bureau:bureau h41 ;
niveau:niveau h41 ;
verdí:verdí h41 ;
partí:partí h41 ;
hálvfemsir:hálvfems h_flt41 ;
hálvtrýssir:hálvtrýss h_flt41 ;
hálvfjerðsir:hálvfjerðs h_flt41 ;
offur+CmpNP/None:of h40 ;
syndaoffur:synda#of h40 ;
syndoffur:synd#of h40 ;
eldoffur:eld#of h40 ;
skuldoffur:skuld#of h40 ;
brennioffur:brenni#of h40 ;
droypioffur:droypi#of h40 ;
roykoffur:royk#of h40 ;
mannoffur:mann#of h40 ;
sektaroffur:sektar#of h40 ;
bótaroffur:bótar#of h40 ;
fagnaðaroffur:fagnaðar#of h40 ;
sláturoffur:slátur#of h40 ;
drykkjuoffur:drykkju#of h40 ;
lovoffur:lov#of h40 ;
skurðoffur:skurð#of h40 ;
produkt:produkt h41 ;
kapittul:kapit h40_2 ;
heiloffur:heil#of h40 ;
grónoffur:grón#of h40 ;
heitoffur:heit#of h40 ;
kilo:kilo h38 ;
hámeldibridge h41 ;
meldingarbridge h41 ;
gouache h41 ;
caddie h41 ;
walkie-talkie h41 ;
collie h41 ;
milkshake h41 ;
troke h41 ;
moské h41 ;
ukulele h41 ;
ostasouffle h41 ;
allé h41 ;
guacamole h41 ;
ragtime h41 ;
fettuccine h41 ;
julienne h41 ;
acetone h41 ;
kupe h41 ;
urtate h41 ;
kamillute h41 ;
byte h41 ;
gigabyte h41 ;
kilobyte h41 ;
einskildue h41 ;
fondue h41 ;
avenue h41 ;
